src/scripts/Macedonian/stress_dictionary.foma
{цит`ат} |
{црвено-ц`рн} |
{црвенобр`ад} |
{црвенок`ож} |
{црвенок`ос} |
{цун`ами} |
{четвртфин`але} |
{чиле`анец} |
{чиле`анка} |
{чиле`ански} |
{чиле`анци} |
{шампи`он} |
{шамп`он} |
{шарм`антен} |
{штафел`ај} |
{јак`упи} |
{јам`ајка} |
{јану`ари} |
{јаш`ари} |
{ју`анде} |
{јубил`еј} |
{југоз`апад} |
{југо`исток} |
{јулиј`ана} |
{љубљ`ана} |
{џак`арта} |
{џаф`ери} |
{џиб`ути;} |
{џуз`епе} ;

# regex stressIrregularWords ;
define WordDic [[stressIrregularWords | OtherStressWord] .o. [%` -> 0]].i ; 
define StemDic [Stem  .o. [%` -> 0]].i ; 
define SuffixDic  [Suffix .o. [%` -> 0]].i ; 

define ApplyStressDictionary 
 [	WordDic -> || .#. _ .#. ] .o.  
 [	StemDic -> || .#. _ [ [\StressMark]+ | .#.] ] .o. 
 [	SuffixDic -> || .#. [\StressMark]+  _ .#. ]
  ;
